Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1402.
Powers and duties of the Board.

The Board shall carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter and compatible provisions of federal acts and is authorized to:

Supervise and control waste management activities in the Commonwealth.

Consult, advise and coordinate with the Governor, the Secretary, the General Assembly, and other state and federal agencies for the purpose of implementing this chapter and the federal acts.

Provide technical assistance and advice concerning all aspects of waste management.

Develop and keep current state waste management plans and provide technical assistance, advice and other aid for the development and implementation of local and regional waste management plans.

Promote the development of resource conservation and resource recovery systems and provide technical assistance and advice on resource conservation, resource recovery and resource recovery systems.

Collect data necessary to conduct the state waste programs, including data on the identification of and amounts of waste generated, transported, stored, treated or disposed, and resource recovery.

Require any person who generates, collects, transports, stores or provides treatment or disposal of a hazardous waste to maintain records, manifests and reporting systems required pursuant to federal statute or regulation.

Designate, in accordance with criteria and listings identified under federal statute or regulation, classes, types or lists of waste that it deems to be hazardous.

Consult and coordinate with the heads of appropriate state and federal agencies, independent regulatory agencies and other governmental instrumentalities for the purpose of achieving maximum effectiveness and enforcement of this chapter while imposing the least burden of duplicative requirements on those persons subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Apply for federal funds and transmit such funds to appropriate persons.

Promulgate and enforce regulations, and provide for reasonable variances and exemptions necessary to carry out its powers and duties and the intent of this chapter and the federal acts, except that a description of provisions of any proposed regulation which are more restrictive than applicable federal requirements, together with the reason why the more restrictive provisions are needed, shall be provided to the standing committee of each house of the General Assembly to which matters relating to the content of the regulation are most properly referable.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, acquire by purchase, exercise of the right of eminent domain as provided in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1, grant, gift, devise or otherwise, the fee simple title to any lands, selected in the discretion of the Board as constituting necessary and appropriate sites to be used for the management of hazardous waste as defined in this chapter, including lands adjacent to the site as the Board may deem necessary or suitable for restricted areas. In all instances the Board shall dedicate lands so acquired in perpetuity to such purposes. In its selection of a site pursuant to this subdivision, the Board shall consider the appropriateness of any state-owned property for a disposal site in accordance with the criteria for selection of a hazardous waste management site.

Assume responsibility for the perpetual custody and maintenance of any hazardous waste management facilities.

Collect, from any person operating or using a hazardous waste management facility, fees sufficient to finance such perpetual custody and maintenance due to that facility as may be necessary. All fees received by the Board pursuant to this subdivision shall be used exclusively to satisfy the responsibilities assumed by the Board for the perpetual custody and maintenance of hazardous waste management facilities.

15a.

Collect, from any person operating or proposing to operate a hazardous waste treatment, storage or disposal facility or any person transporting hazardous waste, permit fees sufficient to defray only costs related to the issuance of permits as required in this chapter in accordance with Board regulations, but such fees shall not exceed costs necessary to implement this subdivision. All fees received by the Board pursuant to this subdivision shall be used exclusively for the hazardous waste management program set forth herein.

15b.

Collect fees from large quantity generators of hazardous wastes.

16.

Collect, from any person operating or proposing to operate a sanitary landfill or other facility for the disposal, treatment or storage of nonhazardous solid waste: (i) permit application fees sufficient to defray only costs related to the issuance, reissuance, amendment or modification of permits as required in this chapter in accordance with Board regulations, but such fees shall not exceed costs necessary to issue, reissue, amend or modify such permits and (ii) annual fees established pursuant to §

10.1-1402.1

:1. All such fees received by the Board shall be used exclusively for the solid waste management program set forth herein. The Board shall establish a schedule of fees by regulation as provided in §§

10.1-1402.1

,

10.1-1402.2

and

10.1-1402.3

.

17.

Issue, deny, amend and revoke certification of site suitability for hazardous waste facilities in accordance with this chapter.

18.

Make separate orders and regulations it deems necessary to meet any emergency to protect public health, natural resources and the environment from the release or imminent threat of release of waste.

19.

Take actions to contain or clean up any site or to issue orders to require cleanup of any site where (i) solid or hazardous waste, or another substance within the jurisdiction of the Board, has been improperly managed or (ii) an open dump has been created, and to institute legal proceedings to recover the costs of the containment or clean-up activities from any responsible party. Such responsible party shall include any party, including the owner or operator or any other person, who caused the site to become an open dump or who caused or arranged for the improper management of such solid or hazardous waste or other substance within the jurisdiction of the Board.

20.

Collect, hold, manage and disburse funds received for violations of solid and hazardous waste laws and regulations or court orders pertaining thereto pursuant to subdivision 19 of this section for the purpose of responding to solid or hazardous waste incidents and clean-up of sites that have been improperly managed, including sites eligible for a joint federal and state remedial project under the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Public Law 96-510, as amended by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, Public Law 99-499, and for investigations to identify parties responsible for such mismanagement.

21.

Abate hazards and nuisances dangerous to public health, safety or the environment, both emergency and otherwise, created by the improper disposal, treatment, storage, transportation or management of substances within the jurisdiction of the Board.

22.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, regulate the management of mixed radioactive waste.

23.

[Expired.]

History.

1986, cc. 492, 566, § 10-266; 1987, c. 122; 1988, cc. 117, 891; 1990, cc. 499, 919; 1991, c. 718; 1992, c. 853; 1993, c. 456; 2003, c. 940; 2004, cc. 249, 324; 2006, cc. 16, 163; 2020, c. 621.

Cross references.

As to alternate compliance methods for persons or facilities meeting the criteria for E3 or E4 facilities under §

10.1-1187.3

, see §

10.1-1187.6

.

As to escheat of property with hazardous materials, see §

55.1-2417

.

Editor’s note.

For federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, P.L. 96-510, as amended by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, P.L. 99-499, referred to in subdivision 20 above, see generally
42 U.S.C.S. § 9601 et seq.

Acts
2004, cc. 249 and
324, cls. 3 through 7 provide:

“3. That the regulations adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, and the State Water Control Board to initially implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from Article 2 ( § 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia and shall become effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations. Thereafter, any amendments to the fee schedule shall not be exempted from Article 2 ( § 2.2-4006 et seq.).

“4. That it is the General Assembly’s intent that the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall evaluate and implement measures to improve the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of its programs in ensuring the Commonwealth’s air quality, water quality and land resources are protected and to ensure the maximum value from the funding provided for the Commonwealth’s environmental programs. To assist DEQ in accomplishing such goals, a management efficiency peer review shall be conducted of the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit programs and the air permit program implemented by the agency. The review shall evaluate (i) operational changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency’s operations, (ii) ways to reduce the costs of compliance, and (iii) the adequacy and appropriateness of staffing levels to meet state and federal requirements. The review shall be led by a consulting firm with expertise and previous experience in conducting similar reviews of state agencies and private firms and shall include a peer review team appointed by the Director of DEQ, consisting of individuals familiar with the permit program including, but not limited to, persons nominated by the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Chemistry Council, the Virginia Manufacturers Association, the Virginia Municipal League, the Hampton Roads Planning District Commission, and the Virginia Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies. All individuals serving on the peer review team shall have previous training and experience in preparing applications for permits issued under the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program or the air permitting program. The consulting firm shall be selected by agreement between the Director of DEQ and the peer review team members from the previously mentioned organizations and in accordance with the Virginia Procurement Act. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“5. That a review of DEQ’s solid waste permitting and inspection programs shall be conducted in order to ensure that those programs provide maximum efficiency consistent with protection of the environment and public health. The review shall be conducted by DEQ with the active participation of persons qualified by training and experience in the management and operation of solid waste facilities, who shall be recommended by the Virginia Waste Industries Association, the Solid Waste Association of North America and the Southwest Virginia Solid Waste Management Association. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“6. That in order to accomplish the intent of the General Assembly, DEQ shall:

“a. Implement a streamlined permit application to be used for renewals of previously granted environmental permits where there has been no significant change in the permitted activity or applicable statutory or regulatory requirements during the previous permit term. Such streamlined permit renewal application shall be designed, to the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, to avoid the submission and duplication of information that has previously been submitted by the applicant and achieve maximum efficiency and economy for both the permittee and DEQ, and DEQ shall work with the peer review team to develop these applications with the goal of minimizing the amount of duplicate, costly work on the part of the permit renewal applicants and DEQ;

“b. Expeditiously implement electronic permitting, filing and reporting procedures so as to improve access to information, reduce the costs of compliance, and reduce costs to DEQ;

“c. Explore ways to reduce compliance costs to the permittee and reduce DEQ’s oversight costs for ensuring compliance. The options to be explored shall include, but not be limited to, increased utilization of certified evaluations (i.e., by professional engineers) as a method of ensuring compliance while reducing the need for physical inspections; and

“d. Encourage efficient and effective environmental performance by deeming a facility’s demonstration of a proven environmental management system, such as ISO 14001, along with a commitment to pollution prevention, annual progress reporting, and a record of sustained compliance as meeting the criteria for acceptance into DEQ’s programs for environmental excellence.

“7. That if general fund revenues in excess of $500,000 per year over the Governor’s submitted budget for natural resources for the 2004-2006 biennium are appropriated by the 2004 Appropriation Act and are allocated for implementation of the water permit programs, the water permit fees set forth in or established pursuant to this act shall be reduced by a pro rata basis.” No appropriation over and above was made; therefore there will be no fee reduction.

Acts
2006, cc. 16 and
163, in cl. 2 provides: “That prior to January 1, 2007, the Virginia Waste Management Board shall consult with the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles and industry representatives and issue guidelines or regulations concerning the criteria and standards for removal of mercury switches by vehicle demolishers. Removal of mercury switches shall not be required in cases where it is unreasonable, impractical, or the vehicle has been damaged in such a way as to prevent removal. The Virginia Waste Management Board shall consult with vehicle manufacturers to develop guidelines or regulations for storage, shipping, recycling, or disposal of mercury switches removed from vehicles. Manufacturers shall participate individually or as a group in providing for postremoval handling of mercury switches. Adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act ( § 2.2-4000 et seq. of the Code of Virginia).”

Acts
2006, cc. 16 and
163, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2011, c. 311,
provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2015.” Former subdivision 23 expired July 1, 2015.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision 8; substituted “Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title
25.1” for “Chapter 1.1 (§ 25-46.1 et seq.) of Title 25” in subdivision 12; and substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision 20.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 249 and 324 are identical, and redesignated former subdivision 15 as subdivision 15a and deleted “application” preceding “fees sufficient to” in the first sentence; added subdivision 15b; in subdivision 16, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation, inserted “reissuance, amendment or modification” and “reissue, amend or modify,” and added clause (ii) at the end; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 16 and 163, which expire July 1, 2015, are identical, and added subdivision 23.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 621, rewrote subdivision 19, which had read, “Take actions to contain or clean up sites or to issue orders to require cleanup of sites where solid or hazardous waste, or other substances within the jurisdiction of the Board, have been improperly managed and to institute legal proceedings to recover the costs of the containment or clean-up activities from the responsible parties.”

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 10.1-1402.01.
Further duties of Board; localities particularly affected.

After June 30, 1994, before promulgating any regulation under consideration or granting any variance to an existing regulation, or issuing any treatment, storage, or disposal permit, except for an emergency permit, if the Board finds that there are localities particularly affected by the regulation, variance or permit, the Board shall:

Publish, or require the applicant to publish, a notice in a local paper of general circulation in the localities affected at least thirty days prior to the close of any public comment period. Such notice shall contain a statement of the estimated local impact of the proposed action, which at a minimum shall include information on the location and type of waste treated, stored or disposed.

Mail the notice to the chief elected official and chief administrative officer and planning district commission for those localities.

Written comments shall be accepted by the Board for at least fifteen days after any hearing on the regulation, variance, or permit, unless the Board votes to shorten the period.

For the purposes of this section, the term “locality particularly affected”
means any locality which bears any identified disproportionate material environmental impact which would not be experienced by other localities.
For the purposes of this section, the transportation of waste shall not constitute a material environmental impact.

History.

1993, c. 944.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 944, cl. 2 provides that the requirements of the 1993 act affecting regulatory actions shall apply only to regulatory actions for which a notice of intended regulatory action has been filed with the Registrar of Regulations on or after July 1, 1993.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

“Locality particularly affected.” —

City was not a “locality particularly affected” by requested variances to Virginia solid waste management regulations and thus was not entitled to receive notice from the Virginia Waste Management Board about the local impact of the proposed action and that the requested variances were granted. City of Norfolk v. Va. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 99 Va. Cir. 465, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 140 (Norfolk Aug. 24, 2018).

§ 10.1-1402.02.
Use, reuse, or reclamation of coal combustion by-product in a flood plain.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for any project proposed after July 1, 2009, the Board shall not exclude or exempt from the definition of solid waste or any solid waste permitting requirements the use, reuse, or reclamation of unamended coal combustion by-product in an area designated as a 100-year flood plain as defined in §

10.1-600

.

History.

2009, cc. 348, 498.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 817, cl. 1 provides: “That every owner or operator of a coal combustion residuals (CCR) surface impoundment, as that term is defined at 40 C.F.R. § 257.53, that is located within the Chesapeake Bay watershed shall conduct an assessment of each such CCR surface impoundment (CCR unit) regarding the closure of any such unit. At a minimum, an assessment shall, for each CCR unit:

“1. Identify and describe any groundwater or surface water pollution located at or stemming from the CCR unit, including pollution identified through past monitoring, and evaluate corrective measures to resolve such pollution. Any such evaluation shall address the issues set forth in 40 C.F.R. § 257.96(c) and shall describe and demonstrate how the proposed corrective measures will restore groundwater or surface water quality.

“2. Evaluate the clean closure of the CCR unit through excavation and responsible recycling or reuse of coal ash residuals by incorporating them into concrete or other products in a manner that prevents the release into the environment of the pollutants contained within the coal ash residuals. Such evaluation shall consider the feasibility of the onsite processing of a CCR unit for cementitious purposes as well as the feasibility of creating a processing facility or facilities to serve multiple CCR units, including offsite CCR units.

“3. Evaluate the clean closure of the CCR unit through the excavation and removal of coal ash residuals to dry, lined storage in an appropriately permitted and monitored landfill, including an analysis of the impact that any responsible recycling or reuse options would have on such excavation and removal.

“4. Demonstrate the long-term safety of the CCR unit, addressing any long-term risks posed by the proposed closure plan and siting, including risks related to extreme weather events, flooding, hurricanes, storm surges, and erosive forces.”

Acts 2017, c. 817, cl. 2 provides: “That no later than December 1, 2017, the owner or operator of any coal combustion residuals surface impoundment (CCR unit) subject to the assessment requirement of the first enactment of this act shall transmit such assessment to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and to the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation.”

Acts 2017, c. 817, cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality (the Director) shall suspend, delay, or defer the issuance of any permit to provide for the closure of any CCR unit until May 1, 2018, or the effective date of any legislation adopted during the 2018 Regular Session of the General Assembly that addresses the closure of a CCR unit in Virginia, whichever occurs later. In deciding whether to issue any such permit, the Director need not include or rely upon his review of any such assessment.”

Acts 2018, c. 632, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall suspend, delay, or defer until July 1, 2019, the issuance of any permit required to provide for the closure of any coal combustion residuals (CCRs) surface impoundment or other CCRs unit that no longer receives CCRs, located within the Chesapeake Bay watershed. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the issuance of any permit required for impoundments where CCRs have already been removed and placed in another impoundment on site, are being removed from an impoundment, or are being processed in connection with a recycling or beneficial use project.”

Acts 2018, c. 632, cl. 2 provides: “That the owner or operator of any coal combustion residuals (CCRs) surface impoundment or other CCRs unit to which the first enactment of this act applies shall by July 15, 2018, issue a request for proposals for entities to conduct recycling or beneficial use projects for the CCRs at such impoundment or unit. The request for proposals shall require responding entities to provide information from which the owner or operator is able to determine (i) the quantity of CCRs, including CCRs below the unit’s waste boundary, that may be suitable for recycling or beneficial use, including but not limited to encapsulated beneficial uses, such as bricks or concrete, in each such CCRs unit; (ii) the cost of such recycling or beneficial use of such CCRs; and (iii) the potential market demand for material recycled or beneficially used from such CCRs.”

Acts 2018, c. 632, cl. 3 provides: “That no later than November 15, 2018, the owner or operator of each coal combustion residuals (CCRs) surface impoundment or other CCRs unit to which the second enactment of this act applies shall transmit a business plan that compiles the information collected pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of such enactment to the Governor; to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Commerce and Labor, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor (the Committees); and to the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation (the Departments). Each such owner or operator and each entity that provided the information collected pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of the second enactment of this act shall provide assistance to the Governor, the Committees, and the Departments, upon request.”

§ 10.1-1402.03.
Closure of certain coal combustion residuals units.

For the purposes of this section only:“Carrying cost” means the cost associated with financing expenditures incurred but not yet recovered from the electric utility’s customers, and shall be calculated by applying the electric utility’s weighted average cost of debt and equity capital, as determined by the State Corporation Commission, with no additional margin or profit, to any unrecovered balances.“CCR landfill” means an area of land or an excavation that receives CCR and is not a surface impoundment, underground injection well, salt dome formation, salt bed formation, underground or surface coal mine, or cave and that is owned or operated by an electric utility.“CCR surface impoundment” means a natural topographic depression, man-made excavation, or diked area that (i) is designed to hold an accumulation of CCR and liquids; (ii) treats, stores, or disposes of CCR; and (iii) is owned or operated by an electric utility.“CCR unit” means any CCR landfill, CCR surface impoundment, lateral expansion of a CCR unit, or combination of two or more such units that is owned by an electric utility. Notwithstanding the provisions of 40 C.F.R. Part 257, “CCR unit” also includes any CCR below the unit boundary of the CCR landfill or CCR surface impoundment.“Coal combustion residuals” or “CCR” means fly ash, bottom ash, boiler slag, and flue gas desulfurization materials generated from burning coal for the purpose of generating electricity by an electric utility.“Encapsulated beneficial use” means a beneficial use of CCR that binds the CCR into a solid matrix and minimizes its mobilization into the surrounding environment.The definitions in this subsection shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with 40 C.F.R. Part 257, except as expressly provided in this section.

The owner or operator of any CCR unit located within the Chesapeake Bay watershed at the Bremo Power Station, Chesapeake Energy Center, Chesterfield Power Station, and Possum Point Power Station that ceased accepting CCR prior to July 1, 2019, shall complete closure of such unit by (i) removing all of the CCR in accordance with applicable standards established by Virginia Solid Waste Management Regulations (9VAC20-81) and (ii) either (a) beneficially reusing all such CCR in a recycling process for encapsulated beneficial use or (b) disposing of the CCR in a permitted landfill on the property upon which the CCR unit is located, adjacent to the property upon which the CCR unit is located, or off of the property on which the CCR unit is located, that includes, at a minimum, a composite liner and leachate collection system that meets or exceeds the federal Criteria for Municipal Solid Waste Landfills pursuant to 40 C.F.R. Part 258. The owner or operator shall beneficially reuse a total of no less than 6.8 million cubic yards in aggregate of such removed CCR from no fewer than two of the sites listed in this subsection where CCR is located.

The owner or operator shall complete the closure of any such CCR unit required by this section no later than 15 years after initiating the closure process at that CCR unit. During the closure process, the owner or operator shall, at its expense, offer to provide a connection to a municipal water supply, or where such connection is not feasible provide water testing, for any residence within one-half mile of the CCR unit.

Where closure pursuant to this section requires that CCR or CCR that has been beneficially reused be removed off-site, the owner or operator shall develop a transportation plan in consultation with any county, city, or town in which the CCR units are located and any county, city, or town within two miles of the CCR units that minimizes the impact of any transport of CCR on adjacent property owners and surrounding communities. The transportation plan shall include (i) alternative transportation options to be utilized, including rail and barge transport, if feasible, in combination with other transportation methods necessary to meet the closure timeframe established in subsection C, and (ii) plans for any transportation by truck, including the frequency of truck travel, the route of truck travel, and measures to control noise, traffic impact, safety, and fugitive dust caused by such truck travel. Once such transportation plan is completed, the owner or operator shall post it on a publicly accessible website. The owner or operator shall provide notice of the availability of the plan to the Department and the chief administrative officers of the consulting localities and shall publish such notice once in a newspaper of general circulation in such locality.

The owner or operator of any CCR unit subject to the provisions of subsection B shall accept and review proposals to beneficially reuse any CCR that are not subject to an existing contractual agreement to remove CCR pursuant to the provisions of subsection B every four years beginning July 1, 2022. Any entity submitting such a proposal shall provide information from which the owner or operator can determine (i) the amount of CCR that will be utilized for encapsulated beneficial use; (ii) the cost of such beneficial reuse of such CCR; and (iii) the guaranteed timeframe in which the CCR will be utilized.

In conducting closure activities described in subsection B, the owner or operator shall (i) identify options for utilizing local workers, (ii) consult with the Commonwealth’s Chief Workforce Development Officer on opportunities to advance the Commonwealth’s workforce goals, including furtherance of apprenticeship and other workforce training programs to develop the local workforce, and (iii) give priority to the hiring of local workers.

No later than October 1, 2022, and no less frequently than every two years thereafter until closure of all of its CCR units is complete, the owner or operator of any CCR unit subject to the provisions of subsection B shall compile the following two reports:

A report describing the owner’s or operator’s closure plan for all such CCR units; the closure progress to date, both per unit and in total; a detailed accounting of the amounts of CCR that have been and are expected to be beneficially reused from such units, both per unit and in total; a detailed accounting of the amounts of CCR that have been and are expected to be landfilled from such units, both per unit and in total; a detailed accounting of the utilization of transportation options and a transportation plan as required by subsection D; and a discussion of groundwater and surface water monitoring results and any measures taken to address such results as closure is being completed.

A report that contains the proposals and analysis for proposals required by subsection E.The owner or operator shall post each such report on a publicly accessible website and shall submit each such report to the Governor, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, and the Director.

All costs associated with closure of a CCR unit in accordance with this section shall be recoverable through a rate adjustment clause authorized by the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) under the provisions of subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1, provided that (i) when determining the reasonableness of such costs the Commission shall not consider closure in place of the CCR unit as an option; (ii) the annual revenue requirement recoverable through a rate adjustment clause authorized under this section, exclusive of any other rate adjustment clauses approved by the Commission under the provisions of subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1, shall not exceed $225 million on a Virginia jurisdictional basis for the Commonwealth in any 12-month period, provided that any under-recovery amount of revenue requirements incurred in excess of $225 million in a given 12-month period, limited to the under-recovery amount and the carrying cost, shall be deferred and recovered through the rate adjustment clause over up to three succeeding 12-month periods without regard to this limitation, and with the length of the amortization period being determined by the Commission; (iii) costs may begin accruing on July 1, 2019, but no approved rate adjustment clause charges shall be included in customer bills until July 1, 2021; (iv) any such costs shall be allocated to all customers of the utility in the Commonwealth as a non-bypassable charge, irrespective of the generation supplier of any such customer; and (v) any such costs that are allocated to the utility’s system customers outside of the Commonwealth that are not actually recovered from such customers shall be included for cost recovery from jurisdictional customers in the Commonwealth through the rate adjustment clause.

Any electric public utility subject to the requirements of this section may, without regard for whether it has petitioned for any rate adjustment clause pursuant to subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1, petition the Commission for approval of a plan for CCR unit closure at any or all of its CCR unit sites listed in subsection B. Any such plan shall take into account site-specific conditions and shall include proposals to beneficially reuse no less than 6.8 million cubic yards of CCR in aggregate from no fewer than two of the sites listed in subsection B. The Commission shall issue its final order with regard to any such petition within six months of its filing, and in doing so shall determine whether the utility’s plan for CCR unit closure, and the projected costs associated therewith, are reasonable and prudent, taking into account that closure in place of any CCR unit is not to be considered as an option. The Commission shall not consider plans that do not comply with subsection B.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require additional beneficial reuse of CCR at any active coal-fired electric generation facility if such additional beneficial reuse results in a net increase in truck traffic on the public roads of the locality in which the facility is located as compared to such traffic during calendar year 2018.

The Commonwealth shall not authorize any cost recovery by an owner or operator subject to the provisions of this section for any fines or civil penalties resulting from violations of federal and state law or regulation.

History.

2019, cc. 650, 651; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 650 and 651 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection G in the last paragraph, inserted “and Historic” and substituted “Labor and Commerce” for “Commerce and Labor.”